src/fst/orthography/inituppercase.regex
a (->) A, b (->) B, c (->) C, d (->) D, e (->) E, f (->) F, g (->) G,
h (->) H, i (->) I, j (->) J, k (->) K, l (->) L, m (->) M, n (->) N,
o (->) O, p (->) P, q (->) Q, r (->) R, s (->) S, t (->) T, u (->) U,
v (->) V, w (->) W, x (->) X, y (->) Y, z (->) Z,
ä (->) Ä, ö (->) Ö, ü (->) Ü, õ (->) Õ, š (->) Š, ž (->) Ž

|| [.#. (["^UnknownWordLike" | "^UnknownName" | "^UnknownString" | "^Punctuation" | "#"]+) ] _ ;

#|| [.#. | "-" | "/"] _ ;
